Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AIR VENTILATION IMPROVEMENT AND GEOTHERMAL INFRASTRUCTURE FOR SCHOOLS FINANCING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin An air ventilation improvement and geothermal infrastructure for schools financing program is established in the Minnesota Climate Innovative Finance Authority. The purpose of the program is to provide low-interest financing to school districts for air ventilation improvements and the installation of geothermal energy systems on or adjacent to school buildings. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Priority; goals. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Climate Innovative Finance Authority must prioritize the use of program money in a manner that achieves a high ratio of private to public money invested through financing mechanisms that support, enhance, and complement the program's goals, including: new text end new text begin (1) prioritizing schools and students in communities with high rates of poverty, as determined by receipt of federal Title I funding; new text end new text begin (2) funding an equal number of projects inside the seven-county metropolitan area and outside the seven-county metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (3) serving as a financial resource to reduce the upfront and total costs to implement qualified projects; and new text end new text begin (4) developing consumer protection standards to ensure that financial support is (i) provided responsibly and transparently, and (ii) in the participating project owners' financial interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin To receive financing under this section, a borrower must be an independent school district under Minnesota Statutes, section 120A.05, subdivision 10; a special school district under Minnesota Statutes, section 120A.05, subdivision 14; or a cooperative unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, subdivision 2. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General fund. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Climate Innovative Finance Authority for the air ventilation improvement and geothermal infrastructure for schools financing program. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Renewable development account. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account in the special revenue fund to the Climate Innovative Finance Authority for the air ventilation improvement and geothermal infrastructure for schools financing program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Cancellation. new text end new text begin Any amount appropriated in subdivisions 1 and 2 that is not used for financing by June 30, 2027, cancels to the account the money was appropriated from. new text end